California, session 20252026, AB458.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 10334.1 is added to the Public Contract Code, immediately following Section 10334, to read:10334.1.No10334.1. (a) For purposes of this section, “firearm accessory” has the same meaning as defined in Section 3273.50 of the Civil Code.(b) No later than July 1, 2027, the Department of General Services, in consultation with the Department of Justice, shall develop model guidelines for offices, officers, departments, divisions, boards, bureaus, and commissions of the state on the procurement of firearms, ammunition, and firearm accessories. The purpose of the model guidelines is to help state entities choose vendors and contractors for the procurement of firearms, ammunition, and firearm accessories that are in compliance with applicable local, state, and federal firearms laws.